Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 13. General Provisions.

Sec. 14.43.910.
Confidentiality of financial need information.

All information submitted in support of a determination of financial need as provided in this chapter is confidential. However, an applicant may inspect or copy information from the applicants’ application, or records relating to the applicant’s own application, or authorize release of the application or records to designated individuals or organizations.

History.

(§ 1 ch 51 SLA 1978)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 14.40.955. Renumbered as AS 14.43.425 in 1982. Renumbered again in 1987.

Sec. 14.43.915.
Alaska education grant account and Alaska performance scholarship award account.

The Alaska education grant account is created as an account in the general fund. Money may be appropriated to the account from the Alaska higher education investment fund under AS

37.14.750

and from other sources. The commission may use the money in the account to pay grants awarded under AS

14.43.400

—

14.43.420

and to pay the cost of administration of the Alaska education grant program created under AS

14.43.400

.

The Alaska performance scholarship award account is created as an account in the general fund. Money may be appropriated to the account from the Alaska higher education investment fund under AS

37.14.750

and from other sources. The commission may use the money in the account to pay scholarships awarded to students under AS

14.43.810

—

14.43.849

.

Of the total amount available annually to the commission for payment of grants under AS

14.43.400

—

14.43.420

and for payment of scholarships under AS

14.43.810

—

14.43.849

, one-third of the combined amount in the accounts established under (a) and (b) of this section shall be available solely for payment of grants awarded under AS

14.43.400

—

14.43.420

. The commission shall annually allocate to all qualified applicants for scholarships awarded under AS

14.43.810

—

14.43.849

two-thirds of the combined amount in the accounts. If an insufficient number of qualified applicants are awarded grants under AS 14.43.400 — 14.43.420 or scholarships under AS 14.43.810 — 14.43.849, or both, before the end of that fiscal year, the commissioner shall redeposit the remaining funds into the Alaska higher education investment fund established under AS

37.14.750

.

The commission shall reserve a percentage calculated under this subsection of the total amount available for awards in the accounts established under (a) and (b) of this section each year for award to students who graduate from a school district with an ADM of less than 800 or from a school that was operated by the Alaska State-Operated School System established under former AS

14.08.020

. The percentage reserved under this subsection shall be calculated by adding the ADMs of districts with an ADM of less than 800 and the number of students enrolled in a school that was operated by the Alaska State-Operated School System established under former AS

14.08.020

that is located in a district with an ADM of 800 or more and then dividing that number by the sum of the ADMs of all districts in the state.

If an insufficient number of applicants apply for the available amount reserved under (d) of this section, the commission shall redeposit the remaining amount in the account from which the funds originated.

In this section,

“ADM” has the meaning given in AS

14.17.990

;

“district” has the meaning given in AS

14.17.990

, but also includes a state boarding school under AS 14.16.

History.

(§ 11 ch 74 SLA 2012; am § 40 ch 89 SLA 2014)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective July 17, 2014, in (a), in the first sentence, substituted “Alaska” for “AlaskAdvantage”, and in the second sentence, added “and to pay the cost of administration of the Alaska education grant program created under AS

14.43.400

”.

Effective dates. —

Section 33, ch. 74, SLA 2012, make subsections (a), (b), (c), (e), and (f) of this section effective September 14, 2012, in accordance with AS

01.10.070(c)

. Section 30, ch. 74, SLA 2012, makes subsection (d) of this section effective April 1, 2013.

Sec. 14.43.920.
Repayment by ineligible recipient.

If a person receives a scholarship, loan, or grant under this title for which the person is not eligible under the provisions of this title, the scholarship, loan, or grant is void and the entire balance of money paid is immediately due to the scholarship, loan, or grant fund. This section is in addition to any penalty that may be imposed according to another provision of law.

History.

(§ 23 ch 5 SLA 1996)

Sec. 14.43.930.
Scholarship program information.

The board shall make information about scholarship programs available in each school district in the state and at each campus of the University of Alaska.

By September 15 before each annual graduation, a qualified high school in the state with a high school graduating class shall provide

to the board a list of the names and addresses of students in the graduating class who meet scholarship eligibility requirements for each scholarship program; and

a notice of eligibility for the scholarship program to those students on the list prepared under (1) of this subsection.

A school district shall amend its policies, including those applying to student directory information, as necessary to comply with this section.

A qualified high school may not provide to the board the name of a student if the parent of the student objects to the disclosure.

In this section,

“board” means the Board of Regents of the University of Alaska;

“qualified high school” means a public high school, a high school accredited by the Northwest Association of Accredited Schools, or a high school registered with the department.

History.

(§ 3 ch 90 SLA 1999; am § 12 ch 58 SLA 2010)

Cross references. —

For applicability and transition provisions related to the enactment of this section, see §§ 4 and 5, ch. 90, SLA 1999 in the 1999 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective June 10, 2010, in (e)(2), substituted “Northwest Association of Accredited Schools” for “Northwest Association of Schools and Colleges”.

Sec. 14.43.990.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“AlaskAdvantage” means the service mark registered by the commission under 15 U.S.C. 1051 (Trademark Act) that is used to describe financial aid and higher education outreach programs and services provided by the commission;

“approved federal family education loan institution” means a postsecondary education institution in this state or outside of this state that is approved for participation in the federal guaranteed student loan program;

“commission” means the Alaska Commission on Postsecondary Education;

“corporation” means the Alaska Student Loan Corporation created in AS

14.42.100

;

“education loan” means a loan made to finance the cost of attendance in a postsecondary education program that is made by the commission or is a loan received through the federal guaranteed student loan program;

“federal guaranteed student loan program” means the programs of the United States government making postsecondary educational financial aid available under 20 U.S.C. 1070 — 1099c-2, as amended;

“on-time student” means an undergraduate who is enrolled and is in regular attendance at classes for 15 or more semester hours of credit or the equivalent during the semester; any combination of semester hours of credit or the equivalent aggregating to the requisite number of semester hours and undertaken during a semester at two or more public or private institutions of higher education constitutes on-time student status.

History.

(§ 28 ch 43 SLA 1991; am §§ 37, 38 ch 85 SLA 2001; am § 28 ch 63 SLA 2004; am § 41 ch 89 SLA 2014)

Revisor’s notes. —

Reorganized in 2001 and 2004 to maintain alphabetical order.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2004 amendment, effective June 17, 2004, added paragraphs (1) and (5).

The 2014 amendment, effective July 17, 2014, added (7).